Utah statutes.
23-20-20.   Children accompanied by adults while hunting with weapon.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Accompanied" means at a distance within which visual and verbal
communication is maintained for the purposes of advising and assisting.
(b) (i)  "Electronic device" means a mechanism powered by electricity that
allows communication between two or more people.
(ii)  "Electronic device" includes a mobile telephone or two-way radio.
(c)  "Verbal communication" means the conveyance of information through speech
that does not involve an electronic device.
(2)  A person younger than 14 years old who is hunting with any weapon must be
accompanied by:
(a)  the person's parent or legal guardian; or
(b)  a responsible person who is at least 21 years old and who is approved by
the person's parent or guardian.
(3)  A person younger than 16 years old who is hunting big game with any
weapon must be accompanied by:
(a)  the person's parent or legal guardian; or
(b)  a responsible person who is at least 21 years old and who is approved by
the person's parent or guardian.
(4)  A person who is at least 14 years old but younger than 16 years old must
be accompanied by a person who is at least 21 years old while hunting
wildlife, other than big game, with any weapon.
